lexc/verb/enhuigeikszt.lexc
LEXICON Casetet10
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^j§igeu§k       #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeo2§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igea§t§igeo§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igea§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaa§t§igeo§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaa§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

LEXICON  Case1tet10
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igeu§sztök  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§igeu§szn§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§igeu§ssz§igeu§k       #;    ! jük/suk
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§igea§  #;


LEXICON AddVerbtet14
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case1tet14;

LEXICON  Case1tet14
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^ssz§igeu§k       #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§igea§ssz§igeu§k       #;    ! jük/suk

LEXICON AddVerbtet16
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Case1tet16;

LEXICON  Case1tet16
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^ssz§igeu§k       #;    ! jük/suk

LEXICON AddVerbtet12
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Impertet12;

LEXICON Impertet12
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nreptet12;
                      Pot1tet12;

LEXICON Nreptet12
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  Pottet12;
                     Pottet122;

LEXICON Pottet12
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInftet12;
                     Casetet12;
LEXICON Pottet122
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInftet12;
                     Casetet12;

LEXICON Pot1tet12
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInftet12;

LEXICON AddInftet12
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
                 Casetet12;

LEXICON Verb
alapszik:alapoz AddVerbtet12;
alkuszik:alku AddVerbtet16;
alkuszik:alkud AddVerbtet12;
betegszik:beteged AddVerbtet12;
cselekszik:cselek AddVerbtet14;
cselekszik:cseleked AddVerbtet12;
dicsekszik:dicsek AddVerbtet14;
dicsekszik:dicseked AddVerbtet12;
dulakszik:dulakod AddVerbtet12;
elégszik:elég AddVerbtet14;
elégszik:eléged AddVerbtet12;
esküszik:eskü AddVerbtet16;
esküszik:esküd AddVerbtet12;
furakszik:furak AddVerbtet14;
furakszik:furakod AddVerbtet12;
gazdagszik:gazdag AddVerbtet14;
gazdagszik:gazdagod AddVerbtet12;
gyanakszik:gyanak AddVerbtet14;
gyanakszik:gyanakod AddVerbtet12;
gyarapszik:gyarap AddVerbtet14;
gyarapszik:gyarap AddVerbtet16;
gyarapszik:gyarapod AddVerbtet12;
hallatszik:hallat AddVerbtet16;
hallatszik:hallatsz AddVerbtet12;
haragszik:harag AddVerbtet16;
haragszik:haragud AddVerbtet12;
hidegszik:hideg AddVerbtet14;
hidegszik:hideged AddVerbtet12;
igyekszik:igyek AddVerbtet14;
igyekszik:igyekez AddVerbtet12;
marakszik:marak AddVerbtet14;
marakszik:marakod AddVerbtet12;
melegszik:meleg AddVerbtet14;
melegszik:meleged AddVerbtet12;
menekszik:meneked AddVerbtet12;
mosakszik:mosak AddVerbtet14;
mosakszik:mosakod AddVerbtet12;
nyalakszik:nyalak AddVerbtet14;
nyalakszik:nyalakod AddVerbtet12;
nyomakszik:nyomak AddVerbtet14;
nyomakszik:nyomakod AddVerbtet12;
nyugszik:nyug AddVerbtet16;
nyugszik:nyugod AddVerbtet12;
növekszik:növek AddVerbtet14;
növekszik:növeked AddVerbtet12;
szándékszik:szándékoz AddVerbtet12;
tanakszik:tanak AddVerbtet14;
tanakszik:tanakod AddVerbtet12;
telepszik:teleped AddVerbtet12;
tolakszik:tolak AddVerbtet14;
tolakszik:tolakod AddVerbtet12;
törekszik:törek AddVerbtet14;
törekszik:töreked AddVerbtet12;
tülekszik:tülek AddVerbtet14;
tülekszik:tüleked AddVerbtet12;
vastagszik:vastagod AddVerbtet12;
verekszik:verek AddVerbtet14;
verekszik:vereked AddVerbtet12;
veszekszik:veszek AddVerbtet14;
veszekszik:veszeked AddVerbtet12;
vetekszik:veteked AddVerbtet12;
öregszik:öreg AddVerbtet14;
öregszik:öreged AddVerbtet12;
ülepszik:üleped AddVerbtet12;
